Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3401 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Lori Brand
Patient Bill of Rights Act of 2025”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3401.1 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Each patient treated in this state shall have the following
rights when being treated:
1. To receive considerate and respectful care, provided in a
safe environment, free from all forms of abuse, neglect, harassment,
and exploitation;
2. To receive information in plain language and in a manner
that is accessible and timely. Communications with the patient
shall be effective and provided in a manner that facilitates
understanding to the best of the patient’s ability.
a. For a patient with one or more disabilities, the right
conferred by this paragraph shall include the use of
accessible websites and the provision of auxiliary
aids and services at no cost to the individual in
accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990 and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
1973.
b. For a patient with limited English proficiency, the
right conferred by this paragraph shall include the
provision of language services at no cost to the
individual, including oral interpretation and written
translations;
3. To receive as much information about any proposed treatment
or procedure as he or she may need in order to give informed consent
or to refuse the course of treatment. Except in emergencies, this
information shall include a description of the procedure or
treatment, the medically significant risks involved in the procedure
or treatment, alternate courses of treatment or nontreatment and the
risks involved in each, and the name of the person who shall carry
out the procedure or treatment;
4. To execute an advance directive for health care concerning
treatment or to designate a surrogate decision-maker with the
expectation that the hospital will honor the intent of that
directive to the extent allowed by law and hospital policy. The
health care provider shall advise a patient of his or her rights
under state law and hospital policy to make informed medical
decisions, ask if the patient has an advance directive, and include
that information in patient records. The patient has the right to
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 2

timely information about hospital policy that may limit its ability
to implement a legally valid advance directive;
5. To participate in the development and implementation of his
or her plan of care and to actively participate in decisions
regarding his or her medical care;
6. To accept medical care or to refuse treatment, to the extent
permitted by law, and to be informed of the consequences of such
refusal;
7. To be informed of his or her rights as a patient in advance
of, or when discontinuing, the provision of care. The patient may
appoint a representative to receive this information should he or
she so desire;
8. To have a family member or representative of his or her
choice notified promptly of his or her admission to the hospital;
9. To request that no information regarding his or her
admittance, diagnosis, or treatment be released;
10. To review and obtain a copy of the medical records
pertaining to his or her medical care, with full disclosure of any
associated fees for such copies, except when restricted by law;
11. To receive reasonable continuity of care, when appropriate,
and to be informed by the doctor and other caregivers of available
and realistic patient care options when hospital care is no longer
appropriate;
12. To confidential treatment of all communications and records
pertaining to his or her care and stay at the hospital;
13. To expect that, within its capability, capacity, and
policies, the hospital shall make a reasonable response to the
request of a patient for appropriate and medically directed care and
services. The hospital shall provide evaluation, service, and a
referral as indicated by the urgency of the case. When medically
appropriate and legally permissible, or when a patient has requested
a transfer, that patient may be transferred to another facility.
The receiving facility shall have first agreed to accept the patient
for transfer. The patient shall also have the benefit of the
complete information and explanation concerning the need for, risks
and benefits of, and alternatives to such a transfer;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 3

14. To a mechanism, which shall be implemented and maintained
by the hospital, for the consideration of ethical issues arising in
the care of patients, and to education on ethical issues in health
care, which the hospital shall provide to caregivers and patients;
15. To be advised of the hospital’s complaint or grievance
process should the patient wish to communicate a concern regarding
the quality of care he or she receives and to be advised of whom to
contact to file a complaint. The patient shall be provided with a
written notice of the complaint determination that contains the name
of the hospital’s contact person, the steps taken on the patient’s
behalf to investigate the complaint, the results of the complaint
and, when possible, the resolution of the complaint concerning the
quality of care;
16. To examine and receive an explanation of his or her bill
regardless of source of payment;
17. To remain free from restraints or seclusion in any forms
that are not medically necessary or are used as a means of coercion,
discipline, convenience, or retaliation by staff;
18. To receive the visitors whom he or she designates,
including, but not limited to, a spouse, a domestic partner, another
family member, or a friend. The patient has the right to withdraw
or deny consent at any time. Visitation shall not be restricted,
limited, or otherwise denied on the basis of race, color, national
origin, religion, sex, or disability; and
19. For a patient who is a Medicare beneficiary, to be
informed, through use of the hospital-issued notice of noncoverage,
in advance of procedures or treatment for which Medicare may deny
payment, including a statement that the beneficiary may be
personally responsible for full payment if Medicare denies payment.
B. A patient, guardian of a patient, or legally authorized
representative of a patient shall have the following
responsibilities:
1. To provide accurate and complete information concerning the
patient’s present complaints, past illnesses, hospitalizations,
medications, and other matters relating to his or her health;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 4

2. To report perceived risks in the patient’s care and
unexpected changes in his or her condition to the responsible health
care provider;
3. For the patient’s actions should he or she refuse treatment
or not follow his or her doctor’s orders;
4. To ask questions when the patient does not understand what
he or she has been told about the patient’s care or what he or she
is expected to do;
5. To be considerate of the rights of other patients and
hospital personnel;
6. To participate in educational and discharge planning
activities necessary to ensure that he or she has adequate knowledge
and support services to provide him or her with a safe environment
upon discharge from the hospital;
7. To ask the doctor or nurse what to expect regarding pain
management, to discuss pain relief options with doctors and nurses
and to help develop a pain management plan, to ask for pain relief
when pain first begins, to help doctors and nurses assess the
patient’s pain, to tell the doctors and nurses if his or her pain is
not relieved, and to tell doctors and nurses about any concerns
about taking pain medication;
8. To keep appointments and to notify the hospital or doctor
when he or she is unable to do so;
9. To be respectful of his or her personal property and that of
other patients in the hospital;
10. To follow hospital procedures; and
11. To ensure that the financial obligations of his or her care
are fulfilled as promptly as possible.
C. Any minor patient has the following rights when being
treated in this state:
1. To be treated with respect in regards to:
a. each child and adolescent as a unique individual, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 5

b. the caretaking role and individual response of the
parent and legal guardian;
2. To provisions for normal physical and physiological needs of
a growing child including nutrition, rest, sleep, warmth, activity,
and freedom to move and explore. Minors shall have the right to:
a. appropriate treatment in the least restrictive
setting,
b. not receive unnecessary or excessive medication,
c. an individualized treatment plan and the right to
participate in the plan,
d. a humane treatment environment that provides
reasonable protection from harm and appropriate
privacy for personal needs,
e. separation from adult patients when possible, and
f. regular communication between the minor patient and
the patient’s family or legal guardian;
3. To consistent, supportive, and nurturing care;
4. To provisions for self-esteem needs which shall be met by
attempts to give the minor:
a. the reassuring presence of a parent or legal guardian,
b. freedom to express feelings or fears with appropriate
reactions,
c. as much control as possible over both self and
situation,
d. opportunities to work through experiences before and
after they occur, verbally, in play, or in other
appropriate ways, and
e. recognition for coping well during difficult
situations;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 6

5. To provisions for varied and normal stimuli of life which
contribute to cognitive, social, emotional, and physical
developmental needs such as play and educational and social
activities essential to all children and adolescents;
6. To information about what to expect prior to, during, and
following a procedure or experience and support in coping with it;
7. To participate in decisions with a parent or legal guardian
affecting his or her own medical treatment; and
8. To the minimization of stay duration by recognizing
discharge planning needs.
D. Notwithstanding subsection C, parents or legal guardians
have the final say in their minor child’s medical care as specified
in Section 2002 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes, subject to the
provisions of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. Each parent or legal guardian of minor patients in this
state shall have the following responsibilities:
1. To continue in his or her parenting role to the extent of
his or her ability; and
2. To be available to participate in decision-making and
provide staff with knowledge of other parent or family whereabouts.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 7

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1600 Page 8